Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF244.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2264YH (4) 91 cm/jh H.F. 244 Section 1. Section 216C.11, subsection 3, paragraph b, Code 1 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 b. A person commits the offense of intentional 3 misrepresentation of an animal as a service animal or a 4 service-animal-in-training if all of the following elements are 5 established: 6 (1) For , for the purpose of obtaining any of the rights 7 or privileges set forth in state or federal law, the person 8 intentionally misrepresents an animal in oneâs possession 9 as oneâs service animal or service-animal-in-training 10 or a person with a disabilityâs service animal or 11 service-animal-in-training whom the person is assisting by 12 controlling. 13 (2) The person was previously given a written or 14 verbal warning regarding the fact that it is illegal to 15 intentionally misrepresent an animal as a service animal or a 16 service-animal-in-training. 17 (3) The person knows that the animal in question is not a 18 service animal or a service-animal-in-training. 19